Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5657.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-27 of the General Laws entitled "Motor Vehicle Offenses" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-27-26. Prompt violation payment.
Any motorist who receives a moving violation, which may be paid without a court
appearance, and who pays the fine in full within thirty (30) days of its issuance, shall not have the
violation recorded on the motorist's division of motor vehicle's driving record; provided, however,
that this procedure may not be utilized more than twice a year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000653
========